Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 1. Roads to Areas Rich in Mineral Resources.

Sec. 19.30.010.
Findings.
[Repealed,
§ 6 ch 167 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 19.30.020.
Purpose.

The purpose of AS

19.30.020

—

19.30.051

is to facilitate the commercial development of mineral resources, except oil and gas, by authorizing funds to participate in construction of developmental access roads into areas where mining prospects of valid commercial promise are inaccessible to truck haulage. These access roads are to be constructed as rudimentary truck roads and to standards that can be readily improved for general public use.
It is the intent of the state to participate with mineral resource developers up to 50 percent for the cost of construction and maintenance of developmental access roads under AS

19.30.020

—

19.30.051

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 47 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 154 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 129 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 167 SLA 1970)

Sec. 19.30.030.
Commissioner of natural resources to approve application.

The commissioner of natural resources may approve applications for construction of developmental access roads under AS

19.30.020

—

19.30.051

.

A request for construction assistance shall be submitted to the commissioner of natural resources by the resource developer, setting out the scope of the development and the resources to be developed.

The commissioner of natural resources shall review the application and, if found feasible and participating funds are available, may enter into a contract in which the state will participate with the applicant in the cost of construction of the road, up to $50,000 or up to 50 percent of the cost, whichever is lower; however, the applicant shall pay for all right-of-way acquisition.

For purposes of (c) of this section, “cost of construction” includes, in addition to costs directly related to the project, the sum total of all costs of financing and carrying out the project. These include, but are not limited to, the costs of all necessary studies, surveys, plans and specifications, architectural, engineering or other special services, acquisition of real property, site preparation and development, purchase, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of real property and the acquisition of machinery and equipment as may be necessary in connection with the project; an allocable portion of the administrative and operating expenses of the grantee; the cost of financing the project, including interest on bonds issued to finance the project; and the cost of other items, including any indemnity and surety bonds and premiums on insurance, legal fees, fees and expenses of trustees, depositaries, financial advisors, and paying agents for the bonds issued as the issuer considers necessary.

History.

(§ 3 ch 47 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 154 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 129 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 167 SLA 1970; am § 23 ch 168 SLA 1978)

Sec. 19.30.040.
Construction and maintenance.

Upon approval of an application and agreement as to state participation, the applicant resource developer shall submit to the commissioner of natural resources road plans and specifications for the standard of construction the applicant believes to be necessary to develop the mineral resource and protect the fish and game resources that may be affected by the road construction. Plans and specifications submitted by each applicant shall be forwarded by the commissioner of natural resources to the commissioner of transportation and public facilities and the commissioner of fish and game and, upon approval by them, the applicant may proceed with construction.

The applicant shall be allowed credit for the use of the applicant’s workers and equipment or those of the applicant’s contractor as the applicant’s share of cost participation. The applicant must submit documentation satisfactory to the commissioner of transportation and public facilities to support the applicant’s participation for this credit.

If the total cost of the road is less than the original estimate, the state shall match only half of the actual cost.

If the total cost of the road is greater than the original estimate, the applicant resource developer shall be responsible for all costs in excess of the agreed upon state participation.

The road becomes the property of the state, and, so long as the road is used by the applicant resource developer, is open to public use, and the applicant shall bear one-half the cost of maintenance.

History.

(§ 4 ch 47 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 154 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 129 SLA 1968; am § 3 ch 167 SLA 1970)

Sec. 19.30.045.
Canadian minerals.

The state may elect, at the joint discretion of the commissioners of transportation and public facilities and natural resources, to authorize participation in a similar manner to that authorized in AS

19.30.020

—

19.30.040

, in construction and maintenance of developmental access roads to the state border for the development of mineral resources that are in adjacent Canadian land if access roads are the most feasible way of developing those mineral resources, and if it is considered by the commissioners to be in the interest of the state to construct the roads; however, the state may participate up to $50,000, or up to one-third of the cost of construction and of the maintenance of these roads in the state, whichever is lower.

History.

(§ 4 ch 167 SLA 1970)

Sec. 19.30.050.
Permanent capital structures prohibited.
[Repealed,
§ 4 ch 129 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 19.30.051.
Regulations.

The commissioner of natural resources and the commissioner of transportation and public facilities shall adopt regulations to implement the purposes of AS

19.30.020

—

19.30.051

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 129 SLA 1968; am § 5 ch 167 SLA 1970)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

19.30.050

. Renumbered in 1968.

Administrative Code. —

For driveway and approach road permits, see 17 AAC 10, art. 2.

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.